District of Columbia statutes.
32-932

Reporting.

Within 6 months after July 22, 2015, the Mayor shall:

(1)

Establish a public information campaign aimed at educating the public on the impact of marijuana use and abuse;

(2)

Report to the Council the type, frequency, provider, and school grade level of health-education programs in public schools related to substance abuse, including programs designed to address alcohol, tobacco, and marijuana use; and

(3)

Evaluate the effectiveness of the District government’s treatment programs regarding the use and abuse of marijuana.

History

July 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-14, § 3, 62 DCR 6870

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 days) addition of this section, see § 2 of the Prohibition of Pre-Employment Marijuana Testing Temporary Act of 2014 (D.C. Law 20-250, April 30, 2015, 62 DCR 1876).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 3 of the Prohibition of Pre-Employment Marijuana Testing Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-525, Dec. 18, 2014, 61 DCR 13112, 20 STAT 4441).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 3 of the Prohibition of Pre-Employment Marijuana Testing Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-31, Mar. 27, 2015, 62 DCR 4536).